West Virginia, session 2026, HB4425.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: §18-2-25e. Athletic eligibility of transfer students. [Repealed]. The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home